Oklahoma, session 2026, SB221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 4, Chapter 354, O.S.L.


2022 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 3933), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 3933. A. The Department shall certify capital


investment authority under the provisions of this act the Oklahoma


Rural Jobs Act in amounts that would not authorize more than Fifteen


Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) in state tax credits to be claimed


against state tax liability in any calendar year for applications


approved before the effective date of this act and Thirty Million


Dollars ($30,000,000.00) in state tax credits to be claimed against

Req. No. 618 Page 1


state tax liability in any calendar year for applications approved


on or after the effective date of this act, excluding any credit


amounts carried forward as provided under subsection A of Section 5


of this act Section 3934 of this title. A rural fund receiving


certification for an application approved prior to the effective


date of this act shall be eligible to receive certification on an


application submitted after the effective date of this act. Within


ninety (90) days of the applicant receiving notice of certification,


the rural fund shall issue the capital investment to and receive


cash in the amount of the certified amount from a rural investor.


At least ten percent (10%) of the rural investor’s capital


investment shall be composed of capital raised by the rural investor


directly or indirectly from sources including directors, members,


employees, officers, and affiliates of the rural investor, other


than the amount invested by the allocatee claiming the tax credits


in exchange for such allocation of tax credits. The rural fund


shall provide the Department with evidence of the receipt of the


cash investment within ninety-five (95) days of the applicant


receiving notice of certification.


B. If the rural fund does not receive the cash investment and


issue the capital investment within such time period following


receipt of the certificate notice, the certification shall lapse and


the rural fund shall not issue the capital investment without


reapplying to the Department for certification. Lapsed

Req. No. 618 Page 2


certifications shall revert to the Department and shall be reissued


pro rata to applicants whose capital investment allocations were


reduced in accordance with the application process provided under


subsection D of Section 3 of this act Section 3932 of this title.


C. A rural fund, before making a qualified investment, may


request from the Department a written opinion as to whether the


business in which it proposes to invest is an eligible business.


The Department, no later than fifteen (15) business days after the


date of receipt of such request, shall notify the rural fund of its


determination. If the Department fails to notify the rural fund of


its determination by the twentieth business day, the business in


which the rural fund proposes to invest shall be deemed an eligible


business.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-618 QD 12/30/2024 4:48:25 PM









Req. No. 618 Page 3